Massachusetts, session 194th, H2082.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a special commission to study and make recommendations to address
concerns about the lack of accountability in contracting and subcontracting of labor and services
in the Commonwealth. The commission shall consider the question of whether and how
individuals and entities that use contractors and subcontractors to perform labor or services shall
be held liable for violations of workplace laws and other workplace abuses related to the
provision of those services, including but not limited to violations of the Massachusetts wage
laws as provided in sections 148, 148A, 148B, 152A, and 159C, of chapter 149; sections 1, 1A,
15, and 19 of chapter 151; and sections 46A through 46R of chapter 140. The commission shall
investigate a variety of structures used by firms today, including but not limited to multi-tiered
of 2

supply chains and temporary staffing in labor-intensive industries such as retail, construction,
building services, hospitality, ports, and health care.
The commission shall consist of 12 members who shall be identified and appointed by
the secretary of labor and workforce development and shall include at least 4 representatives of
unions and community-based organizations that represent or serve workers in industries where
contracting and/or subcontracting are common practices. The secretary shall appoint 1 of the 4
representatives from unions and community-based organizations to chair the commission.
The commission shall report the results of its study and its recommendations, together
with drafts of legislation if necessary to carry its recommendations into effect, by filing the
report with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, who shall forward the report to
the joint committee on labor and workforce development and the house and senate committees
on ways and means not later than December 31, 2026.
of 2